Wyoming, session 2026, SF0035.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 21-3-110(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xlv) is amended to read:
21-3-110. Duties of boards of trustees.
(a) The board of trustees in each school district
shall:
(xlv) Adopt policies governing student
possession and use of cellular telephones and smart devices
in schools. Each district shall submit a copy of the policy
adopted under this paragraph to the state superintendent as
soon as practicable after the initial adoption of the
policy and any time thereafter that the policy is
substantially revised. A smart device shall not include a
wearable device that can only tell time, monitor a person's
health information or track a person's location.
Section 2. Not later than July 1, 2026, each school
district board of trustees shall establish policies
required by W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xlv) as created by section 1
of this act.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0035
ENROLLED ACT NO. 46, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2